Illinois, session 104th, SB1350.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 5Section 9-220.4 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/9-220.4 new)7    Sec. 9-220.4. Water and sewer public utility environmental 8compliance cost recovery. 9    (a) The Commission shall authorize, upon petition by a 10public utility that provides water or sewer service, a 11surcharge or surcharges, independent of any other matters 12related to the utility's revenue requirement, which adjusts 13rates and charges to provide for recovery of costs or capital 14investment associated with any environmental compliance 15requirements pursuant to an enacted environmental statute, 16rule, regulation, permit term, or condition related to, 17including, but not limited to, perfluoroalkyl and 18polyfluoroalkyl substances, cyanotoxins, lead and copper or 19any other emerging chemical or contaminants that are known or 20suspected to pose a risk to human health or the environment. A 21surcharge approved under this Section may provide for the 22recovery of costs or capital investments that were incurred on 23a prospective basis.  SB1350- 2 -LRB104 07325 AAS 17364 b1    (b) On a periodic basis, the Commission shall initiate 2hearings to reconcile amounts collected under a surcharge or 3surcharges authorized under this Section with the actual 4prudently incurred costs recoverable for each annual period 5during which the surcharge was in effect.6    (c) Within one year after the effective date of this 7amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Commission 8shall adopt rules to implement the collection of the 9surcharges under this Section. The rules adopted by the 10Commission under this subsection shall set forth the 11following:12        (1) general requirements that establish limits on 13    customer bill increases under the surcharge or surcharges 14    established under this Section, notice requirements to 15    customers, billing requirements, and any other 16    reconciliations as deemed necessary by the Commission;17        (2) requirements for infrastructure upgrades to be 18    eligible for recovery under the surcharge or surcharges 19    established under this Section;20        (3) other recoverable costs;21        (4) rider and information sheet filing requirements;22        (5) application requirements for initial surcharge 23    filings;24        (6) internal audit requirements; and25        (7) any additional reporting requirements or 26    information the Commission deems necessary in order to   SB1350- 3 -LRB104 07325 AAS 17364 b1    determine the reasonableness and prudence of the surcharge 2    or surcharges established pursuant to this Section.3    (d) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2031. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.